de: Windsurfbrett-Stil: Formel; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Welle; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Stil deske za jadranje: Tekmovlno; Rekreacijsko; Prosti slog; Slalom; Valovi; Drugo
cs: Styl windsurfingového prkna: Kojenecké mléko; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Vlna; Jiné
fr: Style de planche à voile: Formule; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Ondulé; Autre
fi: Purjelautailun tyyli: Kaava; Freeride; Freestyle; Pujottelu; Aalto; Muu
th: สไตล์กระดานวินเซอร์ฟ: สูตร; แบบฟรีไรด์; ฟรีสไตล์; สลาลม; คลื่น; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Стил на дъска за уиндсърф: Формула; Фрирайд; Свободен стил; Слалом; Вълна; Други
zh-CN: 帆板款式: 配方; 自由滑雪; 自由泳; 障碍滑雪; 波浪; 其他
el: Στυλ ιστιοσανίδας: Τύπος; Freeride; Freestyle; Σλάλομ; Κυματιστή; Άλλο
ru: Тип доски для виндсерфинга: Формула; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Слалом; Волна; Другое
zh-TW: 風浪板款式: 配方; 免費乘車; 自由式; 迴旋; 波形; 其他
hu: Szörfdeszka stílusa: Formula; Freeride; Freestyle; Szlalom; Hullám; Egyéb
lt-LT: Burlentės stilius: Laisvojo slalomo; Natūralios gamtos; Laisvasis stilius; Slalomas; Bangelė; Kita
sk-SK: Štýl dosky na windsurfing: Vzorec; Freeride; Voľný štýl; Slalom; Vlna; Iné
ko: 윈드서핑 보드 스타일: 포뮬러; 프리라이드; 프리스타일; 슬라럼; 웨이브; 기타
pt-PT: Estilo de pranchas de windsurf: Fórmula; Livre; Estilo livre; Slalom; Onda; Outro
it: Stile tavola da windsurf: Formula; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Onda; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de placă de windsurfing: Formula; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Wave; Altele
da: Stil for bræt til windsurfing: Formel; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Bølge; Andet
en: Windsurfing board style: Formula; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Wave; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta daske za jedrenje: Formula; Izvan staze; Slobodni stil; Slalom; Valovi; Ostalo
ja: ウィンドサーフィンボードスタイル: フォーミュラ; フリーライド; フリースタイル; スラローム; ウェーブ; その他
pt-BR: Estilo de prancha de windsurf: Fórmula; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Ondulado; Outro
sv: Stil på vindsurfingbräda: Formula; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Våg; Övrigt
vi: Kiểu ván lướt sóng: Công thức; Thể thao tự do; Phong cách tự do; Vượt chướng ngại vật; Gợn sóng; Khác
tr: Rüzgar sörfü tahtası stili: Formül; Serbest sürüş; Serbest stil; Slalom; Dalga; Diğer
es: Estilo de tabla de windsurf: Fórmula; Paseo libre; Estilo libre; Slalom; Onda; Otros
nl: Stijl windsurfplank: Flesvoeding; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalom; Golf; Andere
nb: Windsurfingbrettstil: Formel; Freeride; Freestyle; Slalåm; Bølge; Annet
pl: Styl deski windsurfingowej: Formuła; Freeride; Styl dowolny; Slalom; Fala; Inne